orig/nounLexcErz.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8-unix -*- 
Multichar_Symbols

! tags
+0Suf
+1Sg  !
+1SgM  !
+1SgN  !
+2Sg  !
+3Sg  !
+1Pl  !
+2Pl  !
+3Pl  !
+1  !
+2  !
+20
+Abe  !
+Abl  !
+Acronym  !
+Ad-A  !
+Adj !
+Adv_CEK !
+Adv_NEK !
+Adv !
+Adverbial  !
+Allegro ! лома for ломань
+Anim !
!+Animate ! >> +Anim
+Anthroponym  !
+AntiqLit ! antiquitated, used in modern Lit
+Artifact
+Assoc ! Associative
+Attr
+Capitalizing !
+CEK
+Clan !
+Clt  !Clitic
+CltButi !
+CltGak !
+ClitGak ! KLOSS
+Cnt
+Com !  Comitative
+Common ! >> +NCom
+Comp  !
+Cond  !
+Conj  !
+Conjunction  !
+Count ! > +Cnt
+Cx
+Dat  !
+Deict ! Deictic
+Dem ! Demonstrative
+Deriv  !
+Des  !
+Det  !
+DetArt ! Determinate article "-се"
+Deverbal  !
+Dial  !
+DimK  !
+DimKA   !
+DimKINE !
+DimKE  !
+DimKO  !
+DimNE  !
+DimNYKA  !
+Dog
+Ela  !
+Erz  !Erzya or Erzya-like
+Familiar  !
+First  !
+FirstF  !
+FirstM  !
+ForeignNew
+ForeignOld
+Gen  !
+Ger ! Gerund ZY
+Homestead
+Ideophone !
+Ill  !
+Imp  !
+Inanim !
!+Inanimate ! > +Inanim
+Ind  !
+Indef !
+Indet  !
+Ine  !
+Interj  ! Interjection
+Iter ! Iterative (number)
+Kin
+KLoss !
+Last !
+LastF  !
+LastM  !
+Lat
+Loc  !
+LV !+VowX !alternates with +NoVowX
+Manner !
+Mdf !Moksha
+Mod ! Modal
+N1 ! noun type 1
+N1S ! noun type 1S
+N2 ! noun type 2
+N3 ! noun type 3
+NCom ! common noun
+NConsStem  !
+NCnt !
+Noncount ! >> +NCnt
+NVowStem  !
+NMixedStem  !
+NPrp ! proper noun
+Neg  !
+NoClitic  !
+NoLV !+NoVowX !No linking with suffix.
+Nom  !
+NomGen ! both nominative and genitive usage
+NonNomSg  !
+NoNum ! No number
+NoPossPx  !
+NoPredx  !
+Noun  !
+Noun2  !
+Obj  !
+OldOrth !
+Opt  !
+Orth_dial
+Orth_hyphen
+Orth_Kozl
+Orth_familiar
+Orth_folksy
+OrthMorph
+OrthOld
+OrthPhon
+Orth_ru
+Orth_vHarm ! unexpected vowel harmony: Тенгушень
+Particle  !>> +Prt
+PatronymF  !
+PatronymM  !
+PerifMod ! Periferal modifier
+Pl  !
+Poss  !
+Postp !
+Pred  !
+Pres  !
+PretII  !
+Prol  !
+Pron  !
+Pronoun  ! This should be convertedt to "+Pron"
+Proper  ! >> +NPrp
+Prt !Particle
+Ptc !Participle
+ZPrt  !
+Q  !
+Quant  ! >> +Q
+Sandhi ! set in compound words 
+Settlement !
+Sg  !
+Spatial  !
+State ! Adverb expressing State "кепе, озадо"
+Subj  !
+SurnameM
+Temporal  !Case name
+Temp  !Property of Durativity attributed to noun, e.g. "rain", "day"
+Toponym  !
+Transl  !
+Verb
+V2Adj  !
+V2Nma !Deverbal Noun in "mo" and "ma"
+VConsStem  !
+VVowStem  !
+VTStem  !
+Vocat  !
+VoicingCons !
+Wife !
  !
 ! Ending requiring linking vowel
 !Ending not requiring linking vowel
+OptVow ! Optional with type 2 nominals




! Nominal stem vowels that alternate 
У2
И2

!Nominal stem vowels
!карИ3, ямУ3, верьгизЫ3
У3
И3
Ы3

! Nominal stem vowel following vowel, word finally realized as "й"
!И4

!Suffix final variant vowel for hard vs soft
У4


! conjugational suffix protovowels 
!showing "a" vs "я" and "ы" vs "и" alternation
А2
Ы2

! derivational suffix protovowel  
О1

! clitic proto consonant
Г1
!Prolative
Г2


! Some verbs need a marker for vowel placement
V1

!
!loss and no loss of U2
VLoss
NoVLoss

!
@P.BUTI.ON@
@R.BUTI.ON@
@D.BUTI.ON@
@C.BUTI@

@P.KLOSS.ON@
@R.KLOSS.ON@
@C.KLOSS@

@P.LV.ON@
@P.LV.OFF@
@D.LV.ON@
@C.LV@

@P.NUM.SG@
@P.NUM.PL@
@D.NUM.SG@
@D.NUM.PL@
@C.NUM@




LEXICON Spatials_4cx
+Indet+Loc:^V1 Possessives1 ; 
+Indet+Loc:^V1 Attributes2_A ; 
+Indet+Lat:^V1в Clitics ;
+Indet+Prol:^га Spatials_4cx_Gen ;
+Indet+Prol:^га Attributes2_A ;
+Indet+Abl:^дО1 Spatials_4cx_Gen ;
+OrthPhon+Loc+Det+Art:^це Nouns3 ;
+Loc+Det+Art:^се Nouns3 ;

LEXICON Spatials_4cx_Gen
+Indet+Gen:^нь Clitics ;
 Possessives1 ;

LEXICON Mezty
+Assoc+Pl+Nom:^мезть Clitics ;
+Assoc+Dat:^мезнень Clitics ;
+Assoc+Gen:^мезень Clitics ;
+Assoc+Abl:^мезде Clitics ;
+Assoc+Abe:^мезевтеме Clitics ;
!+Assoc:^мезть Clitics
!+Assoc:^мезть Clitics

LEXICON Nouns1 
+N1: Nouns1-a ;

LEXICON Nouns1-a
< 0:%^  %+LV:V1 "@P.LV.ON@"> Nouns1_A_ReqVow ; !This provides linking vowel
+NoLVStem:^  Nouns1_A_NoReqVow ; !This denies linking vowel
+Cx+Indet+Sg+Nom+0Suf: Tenses1 ;
 Mezty ;

LEXICON Nouns1S 
+N1S: Nouns1S-a ;

LEXICON Nouns1S-a
< 0:%^  %+LV:V1 "@P.LV.ON@"> Nouns1S_A_ReqVow ; !This provides linking vowel
+NoLVStem:^  Nouns1S_A_NoReqVow ; !This denies linking vowel
+Cx+Indet+Sg+Nom+0Suf: Tenses1 ;
 Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns2 
+N2: Nouns2-a ;

LEXICON Nouns2-a
< 0:%^  %+LV:V1 "@P.LV.ON@"> Nouns2_A_ReqVow ; !This provides linking vowel
+NoLVStem:^VLoss  Nouns2_A_NoReqVow ; !This denies linking vowel
+Cx+Indet+Sg+Nom+0Suf: Tenses1 ;
 Mezty ;


LEXICON Nouns3 
+N3: Nouns3-a ;

LEXICON Nouns3-a
+NoLVStem:^  Nouns3_A_ReqVow ; !This denies linking vowel
+NoLVStem:^  Nouns3_A_NoReqVow ; !This denies linking vowel
+Cx+Indet+Sg+Nom+0Suf: Tenses1 ;
 Mezty ;



LEXICON Nouns1_A
!!+Cx PossPx Dx Tx PredPx Clitic
!!Cases1 Possessives1 !Determinatives! Tenses1 PredPersons1 Clitics
<"@D.LV.ON@"> Nouns1_A_NoReqVow ;
<"@C.LV@"> Nouns1_A_ReqVow ;

LEXICON Nouns1_A_ReqVow
+Cx+Indet+Lat:в Clitics ;
+Cx+Ill:зО1 Possessives2 ;
+Cx+Dial+NoNum+Dat+Poss+2Sg:теть Clitics ;
+Cx+Dial+NoNum+Dat+Poss+2Sg:те Clitics ;
+Cx+NoNum+Dat+Poss+2Sg:тень Clitics ;
+Cx+NoNum+Dat+Poss+3:нстэнь Clitics ;
+Cx+Dial+NoNum+Dat+Poss+3:нстэ Clitics ;
+Cx+Dial+NoNum+Dat+Poss+3:нсто Clitics ;
+Cx+Dial+NoNum+Dat+Poss+2Pl:нстэнк Clitics ;
+Cx+Dial+NoNum+Dat+Poss+3Sg:нстэнзэ Clitics ;
+Cx+Dial+NoNum+Dat+Poss+3Pl:нстэнст Clitics ;
+Cx+Dial+NoNum+Dat+Poss+3Pl:нстэст Clitics ;

+Cx+NoNum+NonNomSg+Poss+3Sg:нзО1 Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+1Sgm:м Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Cx+NoNum+NonNomSg+Poss+1SgN:нУ4  Tenses1 ;
+Cx+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+2Sg:тУ4 Tenses1 ;
+Cx+Sg+Nom+Poss+3Sg:зО1 Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Cx+NonNomSg+Poss+3Sg:нзО1 Tenses1 ;
+Cx+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+1Pl:нО1к Tenses1_KLOSS ;
+Cx+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+2Pl:нк Tenses1_KLOSS ;
+Cx+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+3Pl:ст Tenses1 ;
+Cx+Det+Sg+Nom:сь Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Cx+Det+Sg+Gen:нть Clitics ;
+Cx+Det+Sg+Dat:нтень Clitics ;
+Cx+Abl:дО1 Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Transl:ксО1 Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Transl:кс Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Ine:сО1 Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Ela:стО1 Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Comp:шка Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Gen:нь Tenses1 ;
+OrthOld+Cx+Gen:нсе^ Attributes2_A_LVOFF ;
+OrthMorph+Cx+Gen:ньсе^ Attributes2_A_LVOFF ;
+OrthPhon+Cx+Gen:нце^ Attributes2_A_LVOFF ;
+Cx+Ill:с Clitics ;
+Cx+Com:нек Clitics ;


LEXICON Nouns1_A_NoReqVow
+Cx+Indet+Pl:тУ4  Tenses1_Prep-PL ;
+Cx+Dial+Ill:зО1 Possessives2 ;
+Cx+NoNum+Dat+Poss+1Sg:нень Clitics ;
+Cx+Dial+Sg+Nom+Poss+3Sg:зО1 Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Cx+Dial+NoNum+NomGen+Poss+1Pl:нО1к Tenses1_KLOSS ;
+Cx+Dial+Det+Sg+Nom:сь Tenses1_Prep-SG ;
+Cx+Dial+Det+Sg+Gen:сть Clitics ;
+Cx+Dial+Det+Sg+Dat:стень Clitics ;
+Cx+Prol:Г2а Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Abe:втО1мО1 Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Abl:дО1 Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Transl:ксО1 Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Transl:кс Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Ine:сО1 Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Ela:стО1 Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Comp:шка Nouns1_A_SGDET ;
+Cx+Com:нек Clitics ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Com:тне^нек Clitics ;
+Cx+Pl+Det+Nom:тне Tenses1_Prep-PL ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Abl:тне^де Clitics ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Dat:тне^нень Clitics ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Ill:тне^с Clitics ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Gen:тне^нь Clitics ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Lat:тне^в Clitics ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Prol:тне^ва PL_Attributes2_prep ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Abe:тне^втеме PL_Attributes2_prep ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Transl:тне^кс PL_Attributes2_prep ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Ine:тне^сэ PL_Attributes2_prep ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Ela:тне^стэ PL_Attributes2_prep ;
+Cx+Det+Pl+Comp:тне^шка PL_Attributes2_prep ;
+Cx+Dat:нень Clitics ;
+Cx+Com:нек Clitics ;
+Cx+Temporal:не Clitics ;
+Cx+Ill:с Clitics ;

!!!!!!!!Nouns1S_A

LEXICON Root
гвардейской+Adj+ForeignOld:гвардейскойИ3 Nouns1 ;
икельць+DetAttr:икельцИ3 Nouns1S ;
каштанув+Adj:каштанувУ3 Nouns1 ;
мужественной+Adj+ForeignOld:мужественнойИ3 Nouns1 ;
начко+Adj:начкУ2 Nouns2 ;
орькс+Adj:орьксЫ3 Nouns1S ;
полеводческой+Adj+ForeignOld:полеводческойИ3 Nouns1 ;
ситнойге+Adj:ситнойге Nouns3 ;
славянской+Adj+ForeignOld:славянскойИ3 Nouns1 ;
фронтальной+Adj+ForeignOld:фронтальнойИ3 Nouns1 ;
эрявикс+Adj:эрявиксЫ3 Nouns1S ;
Аким+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+First:АкимИ3 Nouns1 ;
алеутава+NCom+Composite+Anim+Cnt:алеутава Nouns3 ;
алпачалго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:алпачалгУ2 Nouns2 ;
амарикс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:амариксЫ3 Nouns1S ;
аффикс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:аффиксЫ3 Nouns1S ;
бакалея+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:бакалея Nouns3 ;
бастун+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:бастунУ3 Nouns1 ;
Брежнева+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameF:Брежнева Nouns3 ;
ваксс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:вакссУ3 Nouns1S ;
вармапеке+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:вармапекИ2 Nouns2 ;
Васюткай+NPrp+VocatKAJ+Anim+Cnt+FirstM:ВасюткайИ3 Nouns1 ;
ведькс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:ведьксЫ3 Nouns1S ;
ведьпаця+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:ведьпаця Nouns3 ;
вирьпакш+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:вирьпакшУ3 Nouns1S ;
Гава+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+FirstM:Гава Nouns3 ;
гимнаст+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:гимнастУ3 Nouns1 ;
гобрёкланго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:гобрёклангУ2 Nouns2 ;
дедыне+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:дедыне Nouns3 ;
дробат+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:дробатУ3 Nouns1 ;
ёмиця+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:ёмиця Nouns3 ;
ёнкс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:ёнксУ3 Nouns1S ;
Илькатя+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+FirstM:Илькатя Nouns3 ;
импровизатор+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:импровизаторУ3 Nouns1 ;
кажлатко+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кажлаткУ2 Nouns2 ;
каракш+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:каракшУ3 Nouns1S ;
караулка+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:караулка Nouns3 ;
кастрюляланго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кастрюлялангУ2 Nouns2 ;
католик+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:католикИ3 Nouns1 ;
каштыкеле+Spatial:каштыкелИ3 Spatials_4cx ;
кемпотмо+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:кемпотмУ2 Nouns2 ;
клавиш+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:клавишИ3 Nouns1S ;
коймеланго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:коймелангУ2 Nouns2 ;
коммутатор+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:коммутаторУ3 Nouns1 ;
конёвге+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:конёвге Nouns3 ;
Курносов+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameM:КурносовУ3 Nouns1 ;
курукс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:куруксУ3 Nouns1S ;
куяпанго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:куяпангУ2 Nouns2 ;
Ледяйкина+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameF:Ледяйкина Nouns3 ;
лёмчувто+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:лёмчувтУ2 Nouns2 ;
мавзолей+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:мавзолейИ3 Nouns1 ;
Манулыч+NPrp:МанулычИ3 Nouns1S ;
меште+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:мештИ2 Nouns2 ;
Миякинская+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameF:Миякинская Nouns3 ;
Назарович+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+PatronymM:НазаровичИ3 Nouns1S ;
новтаведьме+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:новтаведьмИ2 Nouns2 ;
Олодимир+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+FirstM:ОлодимирЫ3 Nouns1 ;
опаня+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:опаня Nouns3 ;
палакс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:палаксУ3 Nouns1S ;
паметьчувто+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:паметьчувтУ2 Nouns2 ;
пенге+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:пенгИ2 Nouns2 ;
питерькурго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:питерькургУ2 Nouns2 ;
пичетикше+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:пичетикше Nouns3 ;
плис+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:плисЫ3 Nouns1S ;
почт+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:почтУ3 Nouns1 ;
прячувто+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:прячувтУ2 Nouns2 ;
Разина+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameF:Разина Nouns3 ;
режнявкс+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:режнявксУ3 Nouns1S ;
сеемепанго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:сеемепангУ2 Nouns2 ;
сиерь+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:сиерИ3 Nouns1 ;
синтез+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:синтезЫ3 Nouns1S ;
сляникине+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:сляникине Nouns3 ;
стольпотмо+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:стольпотмУ2 Nouns2 ;
судало+Adv+Spatial:судалУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
Сярдо+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+FirstM:СярдУ2 Nouns2 ;
телясь+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:телясИ3 Nouns1S ;
тема+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:тема Nouns3 ;
тулго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:тулгУ2 Nouns2 ;
Тумотулов+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+SurnameM:ТумотуловУ3 Nouns1 ;
Филиппич+NPrp+Anim+Cnt+PatronymM+Familiar:ФилиппичИ3 Nouns1S ;
фортепиана+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:фортепиана Nouns3 ;
чилисемаёно+Spatial:чилисемаёнУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
шалаш+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:шалашУ3 Nouns1S ;
шержей+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:шержейИ3 Nouns1 ;
шта+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:шта Nouns3 ;
эмпарго+NCom+Inanim+Cnt:эмпаргУ2 Nouns2 ;
вальмало+Adv+Spatial:вальмалУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
венеле+Adv+Spatial:венелИ3  Spatials_4cx ;
кавалало+Adv+Spatial:кавалалУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
кудыкеле+Adv+Spatial:кудыкелИ3 Spatials_4cx ;
мастор+Adv+Spatial:масторУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
пильгало+Adv+Spatial:пильгалУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
чинеле+Adv+Spatial:чинелИ3 Spatials_4cx ;
авасоло+Postp+Spatial:авасолУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
ало+Postp+Spatial:алУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
васоло+Postp+Spatial:васолУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
вере+Adv+Spatial:верИ3 Spatials_4cx ;
ёно+Postp+Spatial:ёнУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
икеле+Postp+Spatial:икелИ3 Spatials_4cx ;
латало+Postp+Spatial:латалУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
пеле+Postp+Spatial:пелИ3 Spatials_4cx ;
пильгало+Postp+Spatial:пильгалУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
товоло+Deict+Pron+Spatial:товолУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
удало+Postp+Spatial:удалУ3 Spatials_4cx ;
